Hawaii statutes.
§15-10 Counting of absentee ballots.
If the requirements in section 15-9 are met, the return and ballot envelopes
may be opened and the ballot counted as prescribed by law for the voting system
in use.

In those absentee polling places using paper
ballots, counting of the absentee ballots may begin after noon of election day.

In those absentee polling places using the
electronic voting system, the absentee ballots shall be transported to the
counting center in a manner and by a schedule as provided in the rules
promulgated by the chief election officer. In no case, however, shall the
results of the absentee count become publicly known before the polls have
officially closed.

Any person violating this section shall be
guilty of an election offense under section 19-6. [L 1975, c 36, pt of §3; am L
1976, c 106, §4(5); am L 1980, c 248, §1(g)]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next